Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.180

Funeral expense.

Upon the death of any active firefighter, firefighter who is disabled, or retired firefighter, the board shall pay from the fund the sum of two hundred dollars to assist in defraying the funeral expenses of such firefighter.

[ 2007 c 218 s 34; 1959 c 5 s 12; 1957 c 82 s 12. Prior: 1947 c 91 s 8, part; 1935 c 39 s 10; 1929 c 86 s 15; 1919 c 196 s 18; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-47, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.